Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.149

Mobile food units—Reciprocity—Rule making.

(1) Beginning May 1, 2020, a regulatory authority must accept a completed and approved plan review of a mobile food unit from another regulatory authority if:

(a) The applicant has obtained a valid permit to operate the mobile food unit from another regulatory authority; and

(b) The applicant provides the following to the regulatory authority from which the applicant is seeking a permit:

(i) A copy of the current operating permit from the original regulatory authority;

(ii) A copy of the complete approved plan review from the original regulatory authority;

(iii) The most recent inspection report of the mobile food unit from the original regulatory authority that demonstrates compliance with food safety standards; and

(iv) Any commissary agreements that the applicant was required to maintain under the permit from the original regulatory authority.

(2) Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection, the regulatory authority may not require an applicant to submit any additional documents or inspections to obtain a permit to operate the mobile food unit.

(a) The regulatory authority may require an applicant to submit any restroom agreements the regulatory authority determines are necessary to comply with department and state board regulations.

(b) The regulatory authority may require an applicant to submit additional commissary agreements as required by department and state board regulations unless:

(i) A mobile food unit is exempt from the use of a commissary under RCW 43.20.148; or

(ii) A mobile food unit returns to its approved commissary after each day of service as described in the approved plan.

(3) A regulatory authority granting a permit pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may charge the applicant an annual permit fee, but may not charge a plan review or inspection fee.

(4) The state board must adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2019 c 185 s 3.]